Utah statutes.
41-6a-1705.   Obstruction to driver's view or driving mechanism.
(1) A person may not operate a vehicle when it is loaded or when there are in
the front seat more than three persons that:
(a)  obstruct the view of the operator to the front or sides of the vehicle;
(b)   interfere with the operator's control over the driving mechanism of the
vehicle.
(2) A passenger in a vehicle may not ride in a position that interferes with
the operator's:
(a)  view ahead or to the sides; or
(b)  control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.
